Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 4
STANDARDS OF CONDUCT

Editor's note:

This part 4 was added in 1994. It was amended with relocations in 2020, resulting in the addition, relocation, or elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this part 4 prior to 2020, consult the 2019 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Law reviews:

For article, "The Long and Winding Road to Public Benefit

C

orporations in

C

olorado", see 43 Colo. Law. 39 (Jan. 2014).

7-108-401. Standards of conduct for directors and officers.

Each director shall discharge the director's duties as a director, including the director's duties as a member of a committee, and each officer with discretionary authority shall discharge the officer's duties under that authority:

In good faith;

With care; and

In a manner the director or officer reasonably believes to be in the best interests of the corporation.

In discharging duties under this section, a director or officer is entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports, or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, if prepared or presented by:

One or more officers or employees of the corporation whom the director or officer reasonably believes to be reliable and competent with respect to the information, opinions, reports, or statements;

One or more legal counsel, accountants, or other persons retained by the corporation as to matters involving expertise or skills the director or officer reasonably believes are within the person's professional or expert competence;

In the case of a director, a committee of the board of directors of which the director is not a member if the director reasonably believes the committee merits confidence; or

In the case of an officer, the board of directors or any committee of the board of directors.

A director or officer may not rely on information, opinion, reports, or statements as permitted by subsection (2) of this section if the director or officer has knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes the reliance unwarranted.

A director or officer of a corporation, in the performance of duties in that capacity, does not have any fiduciary duty to any creditor of the corporation arising only from the status as a creditor, whether the corporation is solvent or insolvent.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire part amended with relocations, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1930, § 35, effective July 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-108-401 as it existed prior to July 1, 2020.

7-108-402. Standards of liabilities for directors.

A director is liable, as a director, to the corporation or to its shareholders for money damages or other money payment for any act, omission to act, or decision only if the party asserting liability establishes in a proceeding that the challenged act, omission, or decision:

Was not in good faith;

Was one that the director did not rationally believe to be in the best interests of the corporation;

Was one as to which the director was at least grossly negligent, unless the articles of incorporation change the standard of liability to knowing misconduct, knowing violation of law, or negligence;

Was one as to which the director failed to make or cause to be made appropriate inquiry, when particular facts or circumstances of significant concern came to the attention of the director that would have alerted a reasonably attentive director to the need for inquiry;

Consisted of or resulted from a sustained or systematic failure by the director to exercise oversight of the business and affairs of the corporation;

Subject to section 7-108-501, was a breach of the director's duty of loyalty to the corporation, including by directly or indirectly receiving an improper personal benefit; or

Consisted of or resulted from a vote or assent specified in section 7-108-405.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, the party seeking to hold the director liable has:

With respect to money damages, the burden of establishing that the money damages were:

Suffered by the corporation or its shareholders; and

Caused by the director's challenged conduct;

With respect to other money payment under a legal remedy, such as compensation for the unauthorized use of corporate assets, whatever persuasion burden may be called for to establish that the money payment sought is appropriate in the circumstances; or

With respect to other money payment under an equitable remedy, such as profit recovery by or disgorgement to the corporation, whatever persuasion burden may be called for to establish that the equitable remedy sought is appropriate in the circumstances.

A director liable under this section for money damages or for other money payment may offset against the liability any gain to the corporation that the director establishes arose out of the same transaction, unless the offset is against public policy.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire part amended with relocations, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1931, § 35, effective July 1, 2020.

7-108-403. Limitation of certain liabilities of directors and officers.

A director or officer is not personally liable for any injury to person or property arising out of a tort committed by an employee unless the director or officer was personally involved in the situation giving rise to the litigation or unless the director or officer committed a criminal offense in connection with the situation. The protection afforded in this section does not restrict other common-law protections and rights that a director or officer may have.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire part amended with relocations, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1932, § 35, effective July 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-108-402 as it existed prior to 2020, and the former § 7-108-403 was relocated to § 7-108-405.

7-108-404. Limitation of certain remedies - definition.

An action by the corporation or by the board of directors is not void or voidable, and shall not be enjoined or set aside in a proceeding by a shareholder or by or in the right of the corporation, because one or more precluded directors was present at or participated in the meeting of the board of directors at which the action was authorized, approved, or ratified, or executed a consent for the action in the manner provided in section 7-108-202, if the action was authorized, approved, or ratified:

At a meeting, by the affirmative vote of the number of directors present at the meeting that would be sufficient to take action at the meeting under articles 101 to 117 of this title 7 or the bylaws; except that, in determining how many votes would be sufficient, the vote of a precluded director is not counted for purposes of authorizing the action but the director is considered present for purposes of determining a quorum; or

Without a meeting by written consent pursuant to section 7-108-202 and executed by all of the directors, if the number of directors, not including any precluded director, constitutes not less than a majority of all of the directors or such greater number of directors as is required by articles 101 to 117 of this title 7 or the bylaws.

In this section, "precluded director" means a director who violated one or more of the standards of liability set forth in section 7-108-402 (1) with respect to an action described in subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire part amended with relocations, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1932, § 35, effective July 1, 2020.

7-108-405. Liability of directors for unlawful distributions.

A director who votes for or assents to a distribution made in violation of section 7-106-401 or the articles of incorporation is personally liable to the corporation for the amount of the distribution that exceeds what could have been distributed without violating section 7-106-401 or the articles of incorporation if it is established that the director did not perform the director's duties in compliance with section 7-108-401. In any proceeding commenced under this section, a director has all of the defenses ordinarily available to a director.

A director held liable under subsection (1) of this section for an unlawful distribution is entitled to contribution:

From every other director who could be held liable under subsection (1) of this section for the unlawful distribution; and

From each shareholder who accepted the distribution knowing the distribution was made in violation of section 7-106-401 or the articles of incorporation, the amount of the contribution from the shareholder being the amount of the distribution to that shareholder that exceeds what could have been distributed to that shareholder without violating section 7-106-401 or the articles of incorporation.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire part amended with relocations, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1933, § 35, effective July 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-108-403 as it existed prior to July 1, 2020.